src/fst/affixes/codifieds.lexc
LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Z
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:aa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:aan  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:ja  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ä
  CodifiedAcroStem/Ä  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Ä
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hän  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:itä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ö
  CodifiedAcroStem/Ö  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Ö
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hön  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:itä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAbbreviation
    Compounding/Dashed ;
